Massachusetts, session 194th, H5261.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-2-2 of Chapter 5 of the charter of the Town of Oxford, which is
on file in the office of the Archivist of the Commonwealth, is hereby amended by striking out the
words “The town manager need not be a resident of the town when appointed, but he shall take
up residency within eight months following his appointment.”
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1